Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-4,171
Issuance of Class O or M operator's
license; reinstatement of commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit; when.

(1) Following any period of revocation ordered by a court, a resident
who has had a commercial driver's license or
CLP-commercial learner's permit revoked pursuant to section 60-4,169
may apply for a Class O or M operator's license.

(2) Any person who has had his or her commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit revoked
pursuant to section 60-4,169 may, at the end of such revocation period, apply
to have his or her eligibility for a commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit reinstated.
The applicant shall (a) apply to the department and meet the requirements of
section 60-4,144, (b) take the commercial driver's license knowledge
and driving skills examinations prescribed pursuant to section 60-4,155 if
applying for a commercial driver's license, (c) certify pursuant
to section 60-4,144.01 and meet the applicable medical requirements for such
certification, (d) be subject to a check
of his or her driving record, (e) pay the fees specified
in section 60-4,115 and a reinstatement fee as provided in section 60-499.01,
and (f) surrender any operator's
license issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 121;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 491, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 144;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 39;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 38;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 27;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 19;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 52.